prince/dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX D ė       ę               ė         
SFX D ė       e               ė         
SFX D ė       ėje             ė         
SFX D ė       ėj              ė         
SFX D ė       ių              [^dt]ė    
SFX D tė      čių             tė        
SFX D dė      džių            dė        
SFX D ė       ėms             ė         
SFX D ė       ėm              ė         
SFX D ė       es              ė         
SFX D ė       ėmis            ė         
SFX D ė       ėse             ė         
SFX D ės      ių              [^dt]ės   
SFX D tės     čių             tės       
SFX D dės     džių            dės       
SFX D ės      ėms             ės        
SFX D ės      es              ės        
SFX D ės      ėmis            ės        
SFX D ės      ėse             ės        
