prince/dictionaries/lt.dic
abstrakcija/D
administracija/D
Adomkevičius/D
aerouostas/D
Agejevas/D
Agnė/D
aidas/D
Aiškutė/D
akcija/D
aklavietė/D
aktas/D
Alaburda/D
Albertas/D
Aleksandras/D
alga/D
aliarmas/D
Alisa/D
alkoholis/D
Aloyzas/D
Alvitas/D
Ambraziejus/D
amžius/D
Anastazijus/D
Andriukaitis/D
anglas/D
anonimas/D
Antanina/D
antytė/D
antrokas/D
apačia/D
apipavidalinimas/D
aplaidumas/D
Apolonijus/D
apskaita/D
arbata/D
argumentas/D
armėnas/D
artefaktas/D
ašara/D
Aškinis/D
asteroidas/D
ateivis/D
Atlantas/D
atomazga/D
atsarga/D
atstumas/D
atžvilgis/D
augalas/D
auka/D
Aukštelkė/D
Aurimas/D
Austinskas/D
automobilis/D
aviacija/D
Ąžuolas/D
Bagdonienė/D
baitas/D
balansas/D
Baliūnas/D
Baltarusija/D
balutė/D
bankas/D
Bariūnai/D
Bartkuškis/D
baseinas/D
Baubliai/D
bažnytėlė/D
bėglys/D
Benas/D
bendramintis/D
Beninas/D
Bernatoniai/D
biblija/D
Bijotai/D
biologija/D
birželis/D
byla/D
Bliumas/D
Bluvšteinas/D
Bolivija/D
branda/D
Brazilija/D
broliukas/D
brūkšnys/D
Bubiai/D
Budvytis/D
Buivydžiai/D
Bulgarija/D
būrelis/D
burtininkas/D
butelis/D
Butleris/D
Cecilija/D
Celestinas/D
Cezaris/D
Cibulskis/D
ciklonas/D
citata/D
Čivilis/D
Dagienė/D
Dainava/D
daktarė/D
dama/D
Danielius/D
darbas/D
Darius/D
dauba/D
Daugėliškis/D
Dauglaukis/D
Daukniūnai/D
dažnis/D
deficitas/D
dekanas/D
delnas/D
demonas/D
derybos/D
dešra/D
dezinformacija/D
Didkiemis/D
diktatas/D
direktorija/D
diskursas/D
dizainas/D
dogma/D
Domantė/D
Donatas/D
Dovilai/D
drąsa/D
drėgmė/D
Druskininkai/D
Dūkštas/D
duombazė/D
Dusetos/D
dvikova/D
Džibutis/D
ėdesys/D
efektyvumas/D
egzaminas/D
eiga/D
eiliškumas/D
eismas/D
ekonomistas/D
eksportas/D
Elektrėnai/D
elgsena/D
Elvyra/D
Emilis/D
Endriejavas/D
Eratostenas/D
Ernestas/D
estas/D
etiketas/D
euristika/D
Ežerėlis/D
fakultetas/D
Felicija/D
Fidelis/D
filologija/D
finansavimas/D
Flora/D
fonetika/D
fotografija/D
futbolininkas/D
Gačioniai/D
Gailiai/D
Gaižaičiai/D
Galinis/D
galvosūkis/D
gandas/D
Gargždai/D
gaspadorius/D
Gaudrimas/D
gausmas/D
Gediminas/D
Geidžiūnai/D
Gelgaudas/D
generatorius/D
geometrija/D
Gerimantas/D
gertuvė/D
giesmė/D
giminystė/D
Gindvilė/D
Gintautas/D
Giraitė/D
Girionys/D
gitaristas/D
gyvatė/D
globa/D
Gracijus/D
grandinė/D
Gražvilė/D
Grenlandija/D
Grinius/D
grybas/D
Grubliauskas/D
Gruzdžiai/D
Gudkaimis/D
guolis/D
Gvidonas/D
Havajai/D
hibridas/D
hobis/D
horoskopas/D
identifikatorius/D
Ignas/D
įkrova/D
Ilgižiai/D
imperija/D
indėnas/D
inercija/D
inicializacija/D
institutas/D
interesas/D
intonacija/D
Ipolitas/D
Irena/D
išgalės/D
įskiepis/D
ispanas/D
ištrauka/D
Italija/D
Ivanauskas/D
įžanga/D
Jagėlonys/D
Janeliūnas/D
japonas/D
Jaunius/D
javas/D
Joana/D
Jolita/D
Jonuškaitė/D
jubiliejus/DN
Juknius/D
Juodaičiai/D
Juodupė/D
jūra/D
Jurgis/D
Justina/D
Kabiškės/D
kadras/D
kaina/D
Kajetonas/D
kalbotyra/D
Kalnaberžė/D
kaltė/D
kalvis/D
Kamilė/D
kamuolys/D
Kaniava/D
Kapčiamiestis/D
kapšis/D
kardas/D
karys/D
Karmėlava/D
kartas/D
kasa/D
Kastautas/D
katedra/D
kaulas/D
Kavaliauskas/D
Kazimieras/D
keblumas/D
kelelis/D
keliukas/D
kepurė/D
Keturnaujiena/D
Kiaunoriai/D
kielė/D
kilmė/D
kinas/D
kirčiavimas/D
kirvis/D
klaida/D
klasifikatorius/D
klaustukas/D
Kleopatra/D
klipata/D
klubietis/D
koduotė/D
kolega/D
komanda/D
komitetas/D
kompiliatorius/D
kompresija/D
komunistas/D
konfliktas/D
Konstancija/D
konsultantas/D
kontrastas/D
Kopenhaga/D
koridorius/D
kosmosas/D
krantas/D
kredencialai/D
Krekenava/D
Kretinga/D
Krikštėnai/D
Kristoforas/D
Kriūkai/D
Krokialaukis/D
kruopa/D
Kružikas/D
kūdikis/D
Kulda/D
Kulva/D
Kunioniai/D
kupstas/D
Kurkleliai/D
kursyvas/D
kvapas/D
kvitas/D
laida/D
laikotarpis/D
Laimis/D
laisvė/DN
lakūnas/D
lankas/D
Lapiai/D
latakas/D
Lauksodis/D
lavonas/D
leidėjas/D
Lekėčiai/D
lektorius/D
lenkas/D
Leokadija/D
liberalas/D
Liepa/D
lietus/D
ligonis/D
lingvistas/D
linksmintoja/D
Lioliai/D
lituanizacija/D
Liudvika/D
lizingas/D
lygiagretumas/D
loginas/D
loterija/D
Lukaševičius/D
Luksnėnai/D
Mackus/D
magistrantūra/D
makedonas/D
Malaizija/D
malūnas/D
Manikūnai/D
maratonas/D
Margiris/D
Marius/D
marškinėliai/D
mašina/D
Matas/D
matuoklis/D
mažuma/D
Medeikiai/D
Medininkai/D
mėgėjas/D
Meka/D
menkniekis/D
Merkinė/D
mėta/D
metodologija/D
miegas/D
Miežiškiai/D
Mikas/D
Mikutaitis/D
mina/D
ministras/D
miškas/D
Mykolaitis/D
Modestas/D
mokykla/D
Molėtai/D
monitorius/D
Mostiškės/D
motyvas/D
muitinė/D
mūsiškis/D
nagas/D
nameliukas/D
naras/D
narkomanas/D
Natalija/D
naujametis/D
navigacija/D
Nemėžis/D
Neptūnas/D
nėštumas/D
nevykėlis/D
Nikodemas/D
Nociūnai/D
Norimantas/D
Norvegija/D
nugara/D
nuogumas/D
nuomotojas/D
nuostolis/D
oazė/D
Odeta/D
olimpiada/D
operacinė/D
orderis/D
orientacinis/D
Oskaras/D
Ožkasviliai/D
Pabradė/D
padaras/D
pagalbininkas/D
Pagryžuvys/D
pajėgumas/D
Pakalnis/D
Pakiršinys/D
pakraipa/D
pakuotė/D
Palėvenėlė/D
Palnosai/D
pamaina/D
Pandėlys/D
Panočiai/D
papkė/D
Paragvajus/D
pardavėjas/D
paryčiai/D
partizanas/D
pasaulis/D
paskola/D
pasta/D
pastraipa/D
patalpa/D
patikra/D
paukštvanagis/D
pavadys/D
paveikslėlis/D
Pavytinė/D
pažyma/D
peilis/D
pelnas/DN
pergamentas/D
perkūnas/D
perteklingumas/D
Petraitis/D
Pienionys/D
pietūs/D
Pikeliai/D
piliakalnis/D
pilkuma/D
pinigas/D
pirmenybė/D
pistoletas/D
pjūklas/D
platintoja/D
plėtinys/D
plokštelė/D
Plungė/D
Pocius/D
polaidis/D
popierius/D
portalas/D
Poška/D
posūkis/D
požiūris/D
praktika/D
pranašumas/D
pratimas/D
prekyba/D
prevencija/D
prieiga/D
priemenė/D
priešaušris/D
prieveiksmis/D
prizas/D
produkcija/D
proga/D
progresas/D
propeleris/D
provincija/D
psicholingvistika/D
pūga/D
puodukas/D
pusfinalis/D
pusmėnulis/D
puta/D
Radvilė/D
raidynas/D
rajonas/D
ramybė/D
randomizacija/D
Rapolas/D
rašliava/D
ratukas/D
ražiena/D
redaktorius/D
reginys/D
reikšmė/D
rektorius/D
Renaldas/D
replika/D
revolveris/D
ribotumas/D
Rima/D
Rimkai/D
rinka/D
Rita/D
ryšys/D
robotas/D
rokas/D
Romualdas/D
Rubikiai/D
Rudnia/D
rūmas/D
rūpestis/D
Ruzgai/D
šachmatas/D
Šakiai/D
Šalčininkai/D
Saliamonas/D
Saločiai/D
samba/D
sąnaudos/D
sangrąža/D
Santjagas/D
sargybinis/D
sąsiauris/D
šaudyklė/D
šaukštas/D
Saulius/D
sausuma/D
savimonė/D
sąžalynas/D
šefas/D
šeimyna/D
sekretorius/D
seminaras/D
senis/D
Seredžius/D
šešetas/D
Šėta/D
Šiauliai/D
siena/D
Šilai/D
Silvestras/D
Šimkūnaitė/D
sindromas/D
Širvintos/D
siunta/D
šypsena/D
skaidrė/D
skaitykla/D
Skapiškis/D
skeneris/D
Skirmantas/D
skydelis/D
skleidėjas/D
skolinys/D
Skriaudžiai/D
Skudutiškis/D
slapyvardis/D
slėptuvė/D
Sližiai/D
Smalininkai/D
smūgis/D
šneka/D
sodininkas/D
Somalis/D
šovinys/D
spartuolis/D
specifikacija/D
sportas/D
srautas/D
stadija/D
štampas/D
startas/D
statusas/D
stekas/D
stilistas/D
Stoniškiai/D
strazdas/D
studija/D
Subačius/D
Sudeikiai/D
sukilėlis/D
sultys/D
suolas/D
šurmulys/D
Suvainiškis/D
svaigalas/D
Svėdasai/D
Švenčionėliai/D
svetimybė/D
šviesolaidis/D
svirnas/D
Tadžikistanas/D
takas/D
Tamulionis/D
tarifas/D
tarpusavis/D
Tauralaukis/D
Tautgintė/D
Tautvydė/D
teisė/D
telefaksas/D
telkinėlis/D
Teneniai/D
teplionė/D
terminologija/D
teta/D
tėvukas/D
tikyba/D
tinkamumas/D
Tirkiliškiai/D
tyrinėtojas/D
tomas/D
Trakiškis/D
trasa/D
trečiakursis/D
trimetis/D
troba/D
trupinėlis/D
tūkstantmetis/D
Turgeliai/D
Turkmėnistanas/D
tvarinys/D
Tverai/D
Udrys/D
ūkis/D
Undinė/D
uostas/D
Urbonas/D
Usėnai/D
užgaida/D
Užpaliai/D
užsklanda/D
Užusaliai/D
vadyba/D
vaga/D
Vaidotė/D
vaikis/D
vaistinė/D
vakarienė/D
Valdemaras/D
Valentukevičius/D
Valiukevičius/D
Vanagas/D
vargas/D
varnelė/D
varžovas/D
vedlys/D
veiklumas/DN
Veiviržėnai/D
Veliuona/D
vengras/D
vergija/D
vertė/D
Vėžaičiai/D
Vidmantai/D
Vidutinė/D
vienoliktokas/D
vieta/D
Vikaičiai/D
Vilhelmina/D
Vilkyškiai/D
Vilučiai/D
Virbalis/D
viršaibis/D
virtinė/D
viskas/D
Vitas/D
Vydūnas/D
vynas/D
Vytautas/D
Vladislovas/D
voratinklis/D
žaidėjas/D
Žalpiai/D
žarija/D
Zelandija/D
žemynas/D
Zibalai/D
žiedas/D
Žilinai/D
žingsnis/D
Žiobiškis/D
žiūronas/D
žygelis/D
žymė/D
žmona/D
žolynas/D
Žukauskas/D
žvaigždutė/D
žvėrelis/D
